Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-10,136
Class V school district; conveyance of site; conditions; proceeds.

Whenever it is determined by the board of education of a Class V school district that it would be in the best educational interests of the school district that any portion of the real estate legally described in section 79-10,127 and any buildings and improvements erected and maintained thereon be conveyed to the United States, the State of Nebraska, any political subdivision of the state, or any nonprofit corporation which is legally organized and existing under the laws of the state, such portion of the property may be conveyed by such city and school district upon such terms and conditions as are acceptable to such board of education, notwithstanding any restrictions in the original deed to the city prohibiting such conveyance. Such conveyance shall not be subject to the provisions of sections 79-10,128 to 79-10,135. Any proceeds or other consideration received by the school district from such conveyance shall belong solely to the school district, to be used by it for such purposes authorized by the laws governing such school district.

Laws 1982, LB 845, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1070;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 782.